Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2382.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6820SV (1) 91 th/ns S.F. 2382 Section 1. Section 321.20B, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 8A. This section does not apply to an 3 all-terrain vehicle operated on a highway incidental to the 4 vehicleâs use for agricultural purposes pursuant to section 5 321.234A, subsection 1, paragraph âaâ . 6 Sec. 2. Section 321.234A, subsection 1, unnumbered 7 paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 8 All-terrain vehicles A person shall not be operated operate 9 an unregistered all-terrain vehicle on a highway unless one or 10 more of the following conditions apply: 11 Sec. 3. Section 321.234A, subsection 1, paragraphs a and g, 12 Code 2026, are amended to read as follows: 13 a. The operation is between sunrise and sunset and is 14 incidental to the vehicleâs use for agricultural purposes. For 15 purposes of this paragraph, âincidental to the vehicleâs use 16 for agricultural purposesâ includes stopping in the course of 17 agricultural use to obtain fuel for the all-terrain vehicle or 18 to obtain food or a nonalcoholic beverage for the operator. 19 g. The all-terrain vehicle is making a direct crossing the 20 of a highway pursuant to section 321I.10, subsection 7 that is 21 not part of the interstate road system, provided all of the 22 following occur: 23 (1) The crossing is made at an angle of approximately ninety 24 degrees to the direction of the highway and at a place where no 25 obstruction prevents a quick and safe crossing . 26 (2) The all-terrain vehicle is brought to a complete stop 27 before crossing the shoulder or main traveled way of the 28 highway. 29 (3) The driver yields the right-of-way to all oncoming 30 traffic which constitutes an immediate hazard. 31 (4) In crossing a divided highway, the crossing is made only 32 at an intersection of such highway with another public street 33 or highway. 34 (5) The crossing is made from a street, roadway, or highway 35 -1- LSB 6820SV (1) 91 th/ns 1/ 6 S.F. 2382 on which the all-terrain vehicle is authorized to operate to a 1 street, roadway, or highway on which an all-terrain vehicle is 2 authorized to operate. 3 Sec. 4. Section 321.234A, subsection 1, paragraph f, Code 4 2026, is amended by striking the paragraph. 5 Sec. 5. Section 321.234A, Code 2026, is amended by adding 6 the following new subsection: 7 NEW SUBSECTION . 1A. Except as provided in this subsection, 8 a person shall not operate an all-terrain vehicle registered 9 under chapter 321I on a highway. 10 a. A person may operate a registered all-terrain vehicle on 11 an undivided primary road that is not part of the interstate 12 road system and on a paved, undivided secondary road over the 13 most direct and accessible route between any of the following 14 locations: 15 (1) An all-terrain vehicle park or trail. 16 (2) A secondary road on which such vehicles are authorized 17 to operate under paragraph âbâ . 18 (3) A city street on which such vehicles are authorized to 19 operate under paragraph âcâ . 20 (4) The vehicle operatorâs residence. 21 b. (1) A person may operate a registered all-terrain 22 vehicle on any of the following secondary roads: 23 (a) An unpaved secondary road. 24 (b) A paved, undivided secondary road or segment thereof, 25 if authorized by the county board of supervisors. The board 26 shall evaluate the traffic conditions on all such secondary 27 roads under its jurisdiction and designate roadways on which 28 all-terrain vehicles may be operated without unduly interfering 29 with or constituting an undue hazard to conventional motor 30 vehicle traffic. In designating such roadways, the board may 31 authorize all-terrain vehicles to stop at service stations or 32 convenience stores along a designated roadway. 33 (2) Notwithstanding subparagraph (1), a county may prohibit 34 the operation of all-terrain vehicles on a secondary road or 35 -2- LSB 6820SV (1) 91 th/ns 2/ 6 S.F. 2382 segment thereof under its jurisdiction as follows: 1 (a) When the secondary road or segment thereof is closed to 2 motor vehicle traffic pursuant to section 306.41. 3 (b) When the secondary road or segment thereof is designated 4 as a detour route pursuant to section 306.41. 5 (c) For any other secondary road or segment thereof, for no 6 more than seven consecutive days and no more than thirty days 7 in a calendar year when the prohibited days are established by 8 ordinance. 9 c. On a municipal street system if authorized by the city. 10 A city may designate streets under the jurisdiction of the 11 city within its corporate limits, and undivided primary and 12 secondary road extensions in the city, which may be used for 13 the operation of all-terrain vehicles. In designating such 14 streets, the city may authorize all-terrain vehicles to stop 15 at service stations or convenience stores along a designated 16 street. 17 Sec. 6. Section 321.234A, subsection 2, Code 2026, is 18 amended by striking the subsection and inserting in lieu 19 thereof the following: 20 2. A person shall not operate an all-terrain vehicle on 21 a highway in excess of thirty-five miles per hour. A person 22 under the age of eighteen years old shall not operate an 23 all-terrain vehicle on a highway unless the person is operating 24 pursuant to subsection 1, paragraph âaâ . 25 Sec. 7. Section 321.234A, subsection 3, Code 2026, is 26 amended to read as follows: 27 3. As provided in section 321.1 , an all-terrain vehicle is 28 a motor vehicle for purposes of this chapter . Therefore, an 29 all-terrain vehicle operated on a highway shall be equipped 30 with the parts, lamps, and other equipment in proper condition 31 and adjustment as required under this chapter for motor 32 vehicles, including but not limited to the parts, lamps, and 33 equipment required under sections 321.386 , 321.387 , 321.404 , 34 321.432 , and 321.437 except those provisions which by their 35 -3- LSB 6820SV (1) 91 th/ns 3/ 6 S.F. 2382 nature can have no application . 1 Sec. 8. Section 321.234A, Code 2026, is amended by adding 2 the following new subsection: 3 NEW SUBSECTION . 4A. A city or county shall not charge a fee 4 to operate a registered all-terrain vehicle on roads or streets 5 under the jurisdiction of the city or county, as applicable. 6 Sec. 9. Section 321I.10, subsections 1, 2, 4, 5, and 7, Code 7 2026, are amended by striking the subsections. 8 Sec. 10. Section 321I.10, subsection 6, Code 2026, is 9 amended to read as follows: 10 6. All-terrain vehicles A person shall not be operated 11 operate an all-terrain vehicle or off-road utility vehicle on 12 snowmobile trails except where designated by the controlling 13 authority and the primary snowmobile trail sponsor. 14 Sec. 11. Section 331.362, subsection 9, Code 2026, is 15 amended to read as follows: 16 9. A county may regulate traffic on and use of the secondary 17 roads, in accordance with sections 321.234A, 321.236 through 18 321.239, 321.241 , 321.247 through 321.250 , 321.254 , 321.255 , 19 section 321.285, subsection 4 , sections 321.352 , 321.471 20 through 321.473 , and other applicable provisions of chapter 21 321 , chapter 321E , and sections 321G.9 , 321I.10 , and 327G.15 . 22 Sec. 12. Section 805.8B, subsection 2A, paragraph b, 23 subparagraph (2), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 24 (2) For operating violations under section 321I.10, 25 subsections 1 and subsection 6, the scheduled fine is seventy 26 dollars. 27